Florida, session 2026, SB588.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 125.676, Florida Statutes, is created to 25 read: 26 125.676âLocal Government Regulatory Accountability Act.â 27 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 28 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the economic vitality of 29 this state depends on fair, consistent, and transparent 30 enforcement of local government and special district 31 regulations. 32 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that arbitrary or 33 unreasonable enforcement action by a local government or special 34 district, or employees thereof, may impede economic growth, 35 increase costs for housing and business development, and 36 undermine public trust. 37 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 38 uniform standard for regulatory enforcement and create an 39 investigative process and certain legal remedies for a person or 40 business entity subject to an enforcement action under this 41 section. 42 (2)âACTION PROHIBITED.âA county, including employees 43 thereof, may not initiate or threaten to initiate any 44 enforcement action that is determined to be arbitrary or 45 unreasonable by a court of competent jurisdiction. For purposes 46 of this section, an âenforcement actionâ means any decision, 47 determination, demand, inspection, citation, order, denial, 48 interpretation, or any other regulatory action undertaken by a 49 county or employees thereof. 50 (3)âPROCEDURES IN RESPONSE TO PROHIBITED ACTION.â 51 (a)âAny person or business entity subject to an enforcement 52 action may submit to the county a request for review of such 53 action. Within 30 days after receipt of a request for review, 54 the county must review the enforcement action and send to the 55 person or business entity making such request a written 56 response. 57 (b)âIf a county fails to review and respond to a request 58 within the designated time period under paragraph (a), the 59 person or business entity subject to an enforcement action may 60 file a legal action under subsection (4). 61 (c)âEach county shall establish and maintain rules 62 addressing the review of enforcement actions under this 63 subsection. 64 (4)âLEGAL ACTION AND REMEDIES.â 65 (a)âA person or business entity subject to an enforcement 66 action by a county may file a legal action in a court of 67 competent jurisdiction to determine whether such action is 68 arbitrary or unreasonable. Such legal action must be filed 69 within 180 days after the enforcement action. For purposes of 70 this subsection, an enforcement action is arbitrary or 71 unreasonable if the action: 72 1.âIs not supported by applicable law, rule, or adopted 73 policy; 74 2.âDeviates from a prior determination or interpretation 75 without written justification; 76 3.âUnreasonably delays or obstructs lawful development, 77 permitting, or other business activity; or 78 4.âImposes requirements or conditions not authorized by 79 general law, ordinance, or regulation. 80 (b)âUpon finding that an enforcement action is arbitrary or 81 unreasonable, the court shall: 82 1.âAward reasonable attorney fees and costs to the 83 prevailing plaintiff. 84 2.âAward actual damages not to exceed $50,000 per 85 occurrence. 86 3.âIssue injunctive relief to immediately restrain or 87 enjoin the county, including employees thereof, from engaging in 88 any action in violation of this section. 89 (5)âWHISTLE-BLOWER PROTECTION.â 90 (a)âAny person or employee who discloses in good faith 91 information under this section relating to an arbitrary or 92 unreasonable enforcement action is not subject to retaliation 93 and is afforded protection under the Whistle-blowerâs Act. 94 (b)âA prevailing plaintiff in a legal action under 95 subsection (4) may file a complaint in accordance with s. 96 112.31895. 97 (6)âPREEMPTION.âThis section is the sole authority for 98 challenges to arbitrary or unreasonable enforcement actions by a 99 county, including employees thereof. Any local ordinance, rule, 100 regulation, or other local policy that prohibits or restricts a 101 county, including employees thereof, from complying with this 102 section, or any rules adopted under this section, is void to the 103 extent of the conflict. 104 Section 2.âSection 166.0413, Florida Statutes, is created 105 to read: 106 166.0413âLocal Government Regulatory Accountability Act.â 107 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 108 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the economic vitality of 109 this state depends on fair, consistent, and transparent 110 enforcement of local government and special district 111 regulations. 112 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that arbitrary or 113 unreasonable enforcement action by a local government or special 114 district, or employees thereof, may impede economic growth, 115 increase costs for housing and business development, and 116 undermine public trust. 117 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 118 uniform standard for regulatory enforcement and create an 119 investigative process and certain legal remedies for a person or 120 business entity subject to an enforcement action under this 121 section. 122 (2)âACTION PROHIBITED.âA municipality, including employees 123 thereof, may not initiate or threaten to initiate any 124 enforcement action that is determined to be arbitrary or 125 unreasonable by a court of competent jurisdiction. For purposes 126 of this section, an âenforcement actionâ means any decision, 127 determination, demand, inspection, citation, order, denial, 128 interpretation, or any other regulatory action undertaken by a 129 municipality or employees thereof. 130 (3)âPROCEDURES IN RESPONSE TO PROHIBITED ACTION.â 131 (a)âAny person or business entity subject to an enforcement 132 action may submit to the municipality a request for review of 133 such action. Within 30 days after receipt of a request for 134 review, the municipality must review the enforcement action and 135 send to the person or business entity making such request a 136 written response. 137 (b)âIf a municipality fails to review and respond to a 138 request within the designated time period under paragraph (a), 139 the person or business entity subject to an enforcement action 140 may file a legal action under subsection (4). 141 (c)âEach municipality shall establish and maintain rules 142 addressing the review of enforcement actions under this 143 subsection. 144 (4)âLEGAL ACTION AND REMEDIES.â 145 (a)âA person or business entity subject to an enforcement 146 action by a municipality may file a legal action in a court of 147 competent jurisdiction to determine whether such action is 148 arbitrary or unreasonable. Such legal action must be filed 149 within 180 days after the enforcement action. For purposes of 150 this subsection, an enforcement action is arbitrary or 151 unreasonable if the action: 152 1.âIs not supported by applicable law, rule, or adopted 153 policy; 154 2.âDeviates from a prior determination or interpretation 155 without written justification; 156 3.âUnreasonably delays or obstructs lawful development, 157 permitting, or other business activity; or 158 4.âImposes requirements or conditions not authorized by 159 general law, ordinance, or regulation. 160 (b)âUpon finding that an enforcement action is arbitrary or 161 unreasonable, the court shall: 162 1.âAward reasonable attorney fees and costs to the 163 prevailing plaintiff. 164 2.âAward actual damages not to exceed $50,000 per 165 occurrence. 166 3.âIssue injunctive relief to immediately restrain or 167 enjoin the municipality, including employees thereof, from 168 engaging in any action in violation of this section. 169 (5)âWHISTLE-BLOWER PROTECTION.â 170 (a)âAny person or employee who discloses in good faith 171 information under this section relating to an arbitrary or 172 unreasonable enforcement action is not subject to retaliation 173 and is afforded protection under the Whistle-blowerâs Act. 174 (b)âA prevailing plaintiff in a legal action under 175 subsection (4) may file a complaint in accordance with s. 176 112.31895. 177 (6)âPREEMPTION.âThis section is the sole authority for 178 challenges to arbitrary or unreasonable enforcement actions by a 179 municipality, including employees thereof. Any local ordinance, 180 rule, regulation, or other local policy that prohibits or 181 restricts a municipality, including employees thereof, from 182 complying with this section, or any rules adopted under this 183 section, is void to the extent of the conflict. 184 Section 3.âSection 189.0645, Florida Statutes, is created 185 to read: 186 189.0645âSpecial District Regulatory Accountability Act.â 187 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 188 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the economic vitality of 189 this state depends on fair, consistent, and transparent 190 enforcement of local government and special district 191 regulations. 192 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that arbitrary or 193 unreasonable enforcement action by a local government or special 194 district, or employees thereof, may impede economic growth, 195 increase costs for housing and business development, and 196 undermine public trust. 197 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 198 uniform standard for regulatory enforcement and create an 199 investigative process and certain legal remedies for a person or 200 business entity subject to an enforcement action under this 201 section. 202 (2)âACTION PROHIBITED.âA special district, including 203 employees thereof, may not initiate or threaten to initiate any 204 enforcement action that is determined to be arbitrary or 205 unreasonable by a court of competent jurisdiction. For purposes 206 of this section, an âenforcement actionâ means any decision, 207 determination, demand, inspection, citation, order, denial, 208 interpretation, or any other regulatory action undertaken by a 209 special district or employees thereof. 210 (3)âPROCEDURES IN RESPONSE TO PROHIBITED ACTION.â 211 (a)âAny person or business entity subject to an enforcement 212 action may submit to the special district a request for review 213 of such action. Within 30 days after receipt of a request for 214 review, the special district must review the enforcement action 215 and send to the person or business entity making such request a 216 written response. 217 (b)âIf a special district fails to review and respond to a 218 request within the designated time period under paragraph (a), 219 the person or business entity subject to an enforcement action 220 may file a legal action under subsection (4). 221 (c)âEach special district shall establish and maintain 222 rules addressing the review of enforcement actions under this 223 subsection. 224 (4)âLEGAL ACTION AND REMEDIES.â 225 (a)âA person or business entity subject to an enforcement 226 action by a special district may file in a court of competent 227 jurisdiction a legal action to determine whether such action is 228 arbitrary or unreasonable. Such legal action must be filed 229 within 180 days after the enforcement action. For purposes of 230 this subsection, an enforcement action is arbitrary or 231 unreasonable if the action: 232 1.âIs not supported by applicable law, rule, or adopted 233 policy; 234 2.âDeviates from a prior determination or interpretation 235 without written justification; 236 3.âUnreasonably delays or obstructs lawful development, 237 permitting, or other business activity; or 238 4.âImposes requirements or conditions not authorized by 239 general law, ordinance, or regulation. 240 (b)âUpon finding that an enforcement action is arbitrary or 241 unreasonable, the court shall: 242 1.âAward reasonable attorney fees and costs to the 243 prevailing plaintiff. 244 2.âAward actual damages not to exceed $50,000 per 245 occurrence. 246 3.âIssue injunctive relief to immediately restrain or 247 enjoin the special district, including employees thereof, from 248 engaging in any action in violation of this section. 249 (5)âWHISTLE-BLOWER PROTECTION.â 250 (a)âAny person or employee who discloses in good faith 251 information under this section relating to an arbitrary or 252 unreasonable enforcement action is not subject to retaliation 253 and is afforded protection under the Whistle-blowerâs Act. 254 (b)âA prevailing plaintiff in a legal action under 255 subsection (4) may file a complaint in accordance with s. 256 112.31895. 257 (6)âPREEMPTION.âThis section is the sole authority for 258 challenges to arbitrary or unreasonable enforcement actions by a 259 special district, including employees thereof. Any local 260 ordinance, rule, regulation, or other local policy that 261 prohibits or restricts a special district, including employees 262 thereof, from complying with this section, or any rules adopted 263 under this section, is void to the extent of the conflict. 264 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.